North Carolina, session 2025, HB828.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 18C-901 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(13g) Proposition wager. – A wager on an individual action, statistic, occurrence, or
nonoccurrence to be determined during a sporting event and includes any such
action, statistic, occurrence, or nonoccurrence that does not directly affect the
final outcome of the sporting event to which it relates."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 18C-902(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Nothing in this Article shall authorize any of the following:
(1) Sports wagering involving youth sports.
(2) Sports wagering on any of the following:
a. The occurrence of injuries.
b. The occurrence of penalties.
c. The outcome of disciplinary proceedings against a participant in a
sporting event.
d. The outcome of replay reviews.
(3) The Commission serving as an operator of a sports wagering platform.
(4) The placing of a pari-mutuel wager.
(5) The placing of a proposition wager on amateur sports or college sports."
SECTION 2. G.S. 18C-926 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no sports facility shall be open
to registered players for placing sports wagers during the eight hours before or during any college
sports events at the sports facility or adjacent to the sports facility."
SECTION 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
*H828-v-1*